District of Columbia statutes.
48-711

Criminal action.

A person who willfully violates § 48-702(1) is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $5,000 for the first offense or $10,000 for the second or subsequent offense, imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. Each day that a violation continues is a separate violation under this chapter. The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 12, 37 DCR 2631
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(g), 60 DCR 2064

History

1981 Ed., § 33-1011.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes